New York, session 2025-2026, A4173.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2119 of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (g) to read as follows: 3 (g) No memorandum or contract required pursuant to subsection (a) of 4 this section shall be binding on any company for examining, appraising, 5 reviewing or evaluating any insurance policy, bond, annuity or pension 6 or profit-sharing contract, plan or program or for making recommenda- 7 tions or giving advice with regard to any of the above by an insurance 8 broker. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 10 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03364-01-5